Hawaii statutes.
§226-10.5 Objectives and policies for the
economy--information industry. (a) Planning for the State's economy with
regard to telecommunications and information technology shall be directed
toward recognizing that broadband and wireless communication capability and
infrastructure are foundations for an innovative economy and positioning Hawaii
as a leader in broadband and wireless communications and applications in the
Pacific Region.

(b) To achieve the information industry
objective, it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Promote efforts to attain the highest speeds of
electronic and wireless communication within Hawaii and between Hawaii and the
world, and make high speed communication available to all residents and
businesses in Hawaii;

(2) Encourage the continued development and expansion
of the telecommunications infrastructure serving Hawaii to accommodate future
growth and innovation in Hawaii's economy;

(3) Facilitate the development of new or innovative
business and service ventures in the information industry which will provide
employment opportunities for the people of Hawaii;

(4) Encourage mainland- and foreign-based companies
of all sizes, whether information technology-focused or not, to allow their
principals, employees, or contractors to live in and work from Hawaii, using
technology to communicate with their headquarters, offices, or customers
located out-of-state;

(5) Encourage greater cooperation between the public
and private sectors in developing and maintaining a well-designed information
industry;

(6) Ensure that the development of new businesses and
services in the industry are in keeping with the social, economic, and physical
needs and aspirations of Hawaii's people;

(7) Provide opportunities for Hawaii's people to obtain
job training and education that will allow for upward mobility within the
information industry;

(8) Foster a recognition of the contribution of the
information industry to Hawaii's economy; and

(9) Assist in the promotion of Hawaii as a broker,
creator, and processor of information in the Pacific. [L Sp 1988, c 1, §3; am L
2009, c 167, §7; am L 2014, c 133, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next